Rhode Island, session 2025, SB853.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-47-11 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-47 entitled "Weapons"
is hereby amended to read as follows:
11-47-11. License or permit to carry concealed pistol or revolver.
(a) The licensing authorities of any city or town shall, upon application of any person
twenty-one (21) years of age or over having a bona fide residence or place of business within the
city or town, or of any person twenty-one (21) years of age or over having a bona fide residence
within the United States and a license or permit to carry a pistol or revolver concealed upon his or
her person issued by the authorities of any other state or subdivision of the United States, issue a
license or permit to the person to carry concealed upon his or her person a pistol or revolver
everywhere within this state for four (4) years from date of issue, if it appears that the applicant has
good reason to fear an injury to his or her person or property or has any other proper reason for
carrying a pistol or revolver, and that he or she is a suitable person to be so licensed. Said licensing
authorities are prohibited from requiring the applicant to provide any other reason or requirement
for their application other than the aforementioned and are further prohibited from imposing
additional or stricter requirements than the department of attorney general or any fee other than as
required pursuant to § 11-47-12. The license or permit shall be in triplicate in form to be prescribed
by the attorney general and shall bear the fingerprint, photograph, name, address, description, and
signature of the licensee and the reason given for desiring a license or permit and in no case shall
it contain the serial number of any firearm. The original shall be delivered to the licensee. Any

member of the licensing authority, its agents, servants, and employees shall be immune from suit
in any action, civil or criminal, based upon any official act or decision, performed or made in good
faith in issuing a license or permit under this chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding any other chapter or section of the general laws of the state of Rhode
Island, the licensing authority of any city or town shall not provide or release to any individual,
firm, association or corporation the name, address, or date of birth of any person who has held or
currently holds a license or permit to carry a concealed pistol or revolver. This section shall not be
construed to prohibit the release of any statistical data of a general nature relative to age, gender
and racial or ethnic background nor shall it be construed to prevent the release of information to
parties involved in any prosecution of § 11-47-8 or in response to a lawful subpoena in any criminal
or civil action which the person is a party to that action.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001516
========
LC001516 - Page 2 of 3